apertium-deu.deu.dix
<pardef n="Fr/osch__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>öschen</l>    <r>osch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ösche</l>     <r>osch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ösche</l>     <r>osch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ösche</l>     <r>osch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>osche</l>     <r>osch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>osches</l>    <r>osch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>osch</l>      <r>osch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>osch</l>      <r>osch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>osch</l>      <r>osch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oschs</l>     <r>osch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>osch</l>      <r>osch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp-L"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Fr/osch__n_m_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>öschen</l>    <r>osch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ösche</l>     <r>osch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ösche</l>     <r>osch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ösche</l>     <r>osch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>osche</l>     <r>osch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>osches</l>    <r>osch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>osch</l>      <r>osch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>osch</l>      <r>osch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>osch</l>      <r>osch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oschs</l>     <r>osch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>osch</l>      <r>osch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-L"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Fr/ucht__n_f">
  <e>       <p><l>üchten</l>    <r>ucht<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>üchte</l>     <r>ucht<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>üchte</l>     <r>ucht<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>üchte</l>     <r>ucht<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ucht</l>      <r>ucht<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ucht</l>      <r>ucht<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ucht</l>      <r>ucht<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ucht</l>      <r>ucht<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ucht</l>      <r>ucht<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp-L"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Fr/ucht__n_f_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>üchten</l>    <r>ucht<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>üchte</l>     <r>ucht<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>üchte</l>     <r>ucht<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>üchte</l>     <r>ucht<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ucht</l>      <r>ucht<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ucht</l>      <r>ucht<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ucht</l>      <r>ucht<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ucht</l>      <r>ucht<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ucht</l>      <r>ucht<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-L"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Fußb/all__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>ällen</l>     <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>älle</l>      <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>älle</l>      <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>älle</l>      <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>all</l>       <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>all</l>       <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>all</l>       <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>alls</l>      <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>all</l>       <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp-L"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Fußb/all__n_m_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>ällen</l>     <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>älle</l>      <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>älle</l>      <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>älle</l>      <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>all</l>       <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>all</l>       <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>all</l>       <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>alls</l>      <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>all</l>       <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-L"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="F/uß__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>üßen</l>      <r>uß<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>üße</l>       <r>uß<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>üße</l>       <r>uß<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>üße</l>       <r>uß<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uße</l>       <r>uß<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ußes</l>      <r>uß<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uß</l>        <r>uß<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uß</l>        <r>uß<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uß</l>        <r>uß<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uß</l>        <r>uß<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp-L"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="Frosch">          <i>Fr</i><par n="Fr/osch__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Frosch">          <i>fr</i><par n="Fr/osch__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Frucht">          <i>Fr</i><par n="Fr/ucht__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Frucht">          <i>fr</i><par n="Fr/ucht__n_f_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Fuß">             <i>F</i><par n="F/uß__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Fußball">         <i>Fußb</i><par n="Fußb/all__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Fußball">         <i>fußb</i><par n="Fußb/all__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Gruß">            <i>Gr</i><par n="F/uß__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Marschall">       <i>Marsch</i><par n="Fußb/all__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Marschall">       <i>marsch</i><par n="Fußb/all__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Sehnsucht">       <i>Sehns</i><par n="Fr/ucht__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Sehnsucht">       <i>sehns</i><par n="Fr/ucht__n_f_lower"/></e>
